Washington statutes.
RCW 16.58.170

General penalties—Subsequent offenses.

(1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any person who violates the provisions of this chapter or any rule adopted under this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(2) A second or subsequent violation is a gross misdemeanor. Any offense committed more than five years after a previous conviction shall be considered a first offense.

[ 2003 c 326 s 60; 2003 c 53 s 115; 1971 ex.s. c 181 s 17.]

NOTES:

Reviser's note: This section was amended by 2003 c 53 s 115 and by 2003 c 326 s 60, each without reference to the other. Both amendments are incorporated in the publication of this section under RCW 1.12.025(2). For rule of construction, see RCW 1.12.025(1).

Effective dates—2003 c 326: See RCW 16.57.902.

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.